Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-507
Information technology, defined.

Information technology means computing and telecommunications systems and their supporting infrastructure and interconnectivity used to acquire, transport, process, analyze, store, and disseminate information electronically.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 277.